Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.88.010

Findings.

(1) The legislature and the people find that the federal Nuclear Waste Policy Act provides that within sixty days of the president's recommendation of a site for a high-level nuclear waste repository, a state may disapprove the selection of such site in that state.

(2) The legislature and the people desire, if the governor and legislature do not issue a notice of disapproval within twenty-one days of the president's recommendation, that the people of this state have the opportunity to vote upon disapproval.

[ 2003 c 111 s 2201. Prior: 1986 ex.s. c 1 s 3. Formerly RCW 29.91.010.]